Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4604
Act; applicability; how construed; licensure conditions; contract requirements.

(1) The Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and Regulation Act applies to any contract or health benefit plan issued, renewed, recredentialed, amended, or extended on or after January 1, 2023, including any claims processing service or other prescription drug or device service performed through a third party.

(2) As a condition of licensure, any contract in existence on the date a pharmacy benefit manager receives its license to do business in this state shall comply with the requirements of the act.

(3) Nothing in the act is intended or shall be construed to conflict with existing relevant federal law.

Laws 2022, LB767, § 4;

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 22.